District of Columbia statutes.
47-3408

Severability.

If any provision of the District of Columbia Revenue Act of 1937 and the Revenue Act of 1939, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the act, and the application of such provisions to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 693, ch. 690, title VII, § 4
May 16, 1938, 52 Stat. 370, ch. 223, § 7
July 26, 1939, 53 Stat. 1119, ch. 367, title VIII, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

The District of Columbia Revenue Act of 1937, referred to in this section, is 50 Stat. 673, approved August 17, 1937.

The Revenue Act of 1939, referred to in this section, is 53 Stat. 1087, approved July 26, 1939.

1973 Ed., § 47-2503.
1981 Ed., § 47-3408.